Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 25
EXPRESS BUSINESS

40-25-101 to 40-25-103. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 6 of chapter 116, C.R.S. 1963, and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2000. For the text of this article prior to 2000, consult the 1999 Colorado Revised Statutes.